Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-204
Commissions; conviction of felony; effect; fingerprints.

No one may be appointed as an officer who has been convicted of a felony. Fingerprints of all officers shall be taken.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 1, p. 447;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-401;

Laws 1943, c. 126, § 1, p. 428;

R.S.1943, § 55-204;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 80, p. 1607.